src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!LEXICON PXPL3-SG-ILL
! +Sg+Ill+PxPl3+So/CP:%>%{ыӹØ%}шк%{ыӹØ%}%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%} K ;
LEXICON SG-ILL-PXPL3_BACK
 +Sg+Ill+PxPl3+So/CP:%>ышкы%>ышты K ;
LEXICON SG-ILL-PXPL3_FRONT
  +Sg+Ill+PxPl3+So/CP:%>ӹшкӹ%>ӹштӹ                         K ;
!LEXICON PXPL3-SG-INE
! +Sg+Ine+PxPl3+So/CP:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%}%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%} K ;
LEXICON SG-INE-PXPL3_BACK
 +Sg+Ine+PxPl3+So/CP:%>ышты%>ышты K ;
LEXICON SG-INE-PXPL3_FRONT
  +Sg+Ine+PxPl3+So/CP:%>ӹштӹ%>ӹштӹ K ;
!LEXICON PXPL3-SG-LAT
! +Sg+Lat+PxPl3+So/CP:%>еш%>ӹштӹ   K ;
LEXICON SG-LAT-PXPL3_MUTUAL
  +Sg+Lat+PxPl3+So/CP:%>еш%>ӹштӹ         K ;
!LEXICON PXPL3-SG-NOM
! +Sg+Nom+PxPl3+So/PC:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹØ%} K ;
LEXICON SG-NOM-PXPL3_BACK
 +Sg+Nom+PxPl3+So/CP:%>ышты K ;
LEXICON SG-NOM-PXPL3_FRONT
 +Sg+Nom+PxPl3+So/CP:%>ӹштӹ K ;
!+!
LEXICON PL-ABE-PXPL3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Abe+PxPl3+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>ӹштӹ%>де K ;
LEXICON PL-ACC-PXPL3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Acc+PxPl3+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>ӹштӹ%>ӹм K ;
LEXICON PL-COM-PXPL3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Com+PxPl3+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>ӹштӹ%>ге K ;
LEXICON PL-CMPR-PXPL3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>ӹштӹ%>лӓ K ;
 +Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>лӓ%>ӹштӹ K ;
LEXICON PL-DAT-PXPL3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Dat+PxPl3+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>ӹштӹ%>лӓн K ;
 +Pl+Dat+PxPl3+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>лӓн%>ӹштӹ K ;
LEXICON PL-GEN-PXPL3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Gen+PxPl3+So/NPC:%>влӓ%>ӹштӹ%>ӹн K ;
LEXICON PL-ILL-PXPL3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Ill+PxPl3+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>ӹшкӹ%>ӹштӹ K ;
LEXICON PL-INE-PXPL3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Ine+PxPl3+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>ӹштӹ%>ӹштӹ K ;
LEXICON PL-LAT-PXPL3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Lat+PxPl3+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>Е2ш%>ӹштӹ K ;
LEXICON PL-NOM-PXPL3_MUTUAL
 +Pl+Nom+PxPl3+So/NCP:%>влӓ%>ӹштӹ K ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
